Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5837.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Carbon tax" means any tax, fee, charge, surcharge, assessment, or other mandatory monetary payment imposed, either directly or indirectly, based on 1 or more of the following: (i) The emission of carbon dioxide, methane, or any other greenhouse gas. (ii) The carbon content, potential emissions, or type of energy source including, but not limited to, coal, natural gas, oil, gasoline, diesel, propane, or biofuels being produced, distributed, supplied, sold, or consumed. (b) "Energy consumption metric tax" means any tax, fee, charge, surcharge, assessment, or other mandatory monetary payment imposed on a person that is based on, calculated using, or apportioned according to the amount of electricity, natural gas, motor fuel, or other energy consumed, or the greenhouse gas emissions resulting from that consumption. (c) "Local unit of government" means a local government or its subdivision, including, but not limited to, a city, village, township, county, or educational institution; a local public authority, agency, board, commission, or other local governmental, quasi-governmental, or quasi-public body; or a public body that acts or purports to act in a commercial, business, economic development, or similar capacity for a local government or its subdivision, county, city, village, township, charter township, school district, public authority, or any other political subdivision or agency of this state. (d) "Mandatory emissions trading program" means any program that requires a fixed number of permits, allowances, or credits to be held or surrendered based on greenhouse gas emissions and that allows those permits, allowances, or credits to be traded. (e) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other legal entity. (f) "Vehicle-miles-traveled tax" means any tax, fee, charge, surcharge, assessment, or other mandatory monetary payment imposed on the owner or operator of a vehicle that is based on, calculated using, or apportioned according to the number of miles traveled within, through, or into the jurisdiction of the local unit of government. Sec. 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided by federal law or a law of this state, a local unit of government shall not do either of the following: (a) Impose a carbon tax, energy consumption metric tax, vehicle-miles-traveled tax, or mandatory emissions trading program. (b) Enact, enforce, or administer any ordinance, regulation, resolution, policy, rule, or directive imposing a carbon tax, energy consumption metric tax, vehicle-miles-traveled tax, or mandatory emissions trading program (2) Any existing ordinance, resolution, regulation, program, rule, or policy enacted by a local unit of government that violates subsection (1) is declared null, void, and of no force or effect. Sec. 5. (1) The attorney general or a person aggrieved by a violation of this act may bring an action in the circuit court of the county in which the alleged violation occurs to enjoin the enactment, enforcement, or administration of any ordinance, regulation, rule, resolution, or policy in violation of this act. (2) If a person other than the attorney general prevails, the court shall award the prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees and costs. (3) A local unit of government shall not use public funds to enact, enforce, or defend any ordinance, regulation, resolution, policy, rule, or directive that is in violation of this act. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.